Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2008
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-2001 to 44-2008 shall be known and may be cited as the Unauthorized Insurers Act.

Laws 1969, c. 351, § 8, p. 1231;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 188;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 82.